Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 HF 2513 (3) 91 je/ns/md H.F. 2513 Section 1. Section 260C.14, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 27. Adopt a policy prohibiting the 3 community college from entering into an employment contract on 4 or after July 1, 2026, with an individual who is a holder of a 5 valid federal H-1B visa and who is also a citizen of a nation 6 designated as a foreign adversary by regulation of the United 7 States secretary of commerce or designated as a state sponsor 8 of terrorism by the United States secretary of state. 9 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 261M.1 Definition. 10 As used in this chapter, âinstitution of higher educationâ 11 means a college or university located in this state that 12 provides a postsecondary course of instruction to students 13 in this state that leads to a degree. âInstitution of higher 14 educationâ does not include an institution governed by the state 15 board of regents or a community college. 16 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 261M.2 Employment of certain visa 17 holders prohibited. 18 An institution of higher education shall not enter into 19 an employment contract on or after July 1, 2026, with an 20 individual who is a holder of a valid federal H-1B visa and who 21 is also a citizen of a nation designated as a foreign adversary 22 by regulation of the United States secretary of commerce or 23 designated as a state sponsor of terrorism by the United States 24 secretary of state. 25 Sec. 4. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 26 following new subsection: 27 NEW SUBSECTION . 43. Adopt a policy prohibiting an 28 institution of higher education under its control from entering 29 into an employment contract on or after July 1, 2026, with an 30 individual who is a holder of a valid federal H-1B visa and who 31 is also a citizen of a nation designated as a foreign adversary 32 by regulation of the United States secretary of commerce or 33 designated as a state sponsor of terrorism by the United States 34 secretary of state. 35 -1- HF 2513 (3) 91 je/ns/md 1/ 1